Hawaii statutes.
§604-2 Appointment and tenure of district
judges; per diem district judges. (a) The chief justice of the supreme
court, with the consent of the senate, shall appoint district judges. Each
judge shall reside in the judicial circuit for which the judge is appointed and
shall have been an attorney licensed to practice in all the courts of the State
for at least five years. District judges shall hold office for a term of six
years and until their successors are appointed and qualified; provided that any
judge may be reprimanded, disciplined, suspended with or without salary,
relieved, or removed from office for misconduct or disability, as provided by
rules adopted by the supreme court.

(b) The chief justice shall appoint district
judges to serve on a per diem basis and as may be necessary to provide
auxiliary judicial functions in the several districts of the State. Per diem
district judges may engage in the private practice of law during their term of
service, and shall receive per diem compensation for the days on which actual
service is rendered based on the monthly rate of compensation paid to a
district court judge. For the purpose of determining per diem compensation in
this section, a month shall be deemed to consist of twenty-one days. [L 1892, c
57, §9; am L 1905, c 61, §2; am L 1919, c 108, §2; RL 1925, §2273; RL 1935,
§3761; RL 1945, §9672; RL 1955, §216-2; am L 1965, c 97, §14; HRS §604-2; am L
1970, c 188, §9; am L 1979, c 16, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c 282, §1]

Rules of Court

Misconduct, see Hawaii Revised Code of Judicial Conduct;
judicial conduct commission, see RSC rule 8.

Case Notes

Malfeasance of district judge reviewed. 5 H. 283 (1885).

Error of judgment not cause for removal, but continued career
of gross mistakes might be. 5 H. 669 (1878).

Magistrate removed from office for misconduct. 7 H. 257
(1888); 8 H. 296 (1891); 8 H. 298 (1891); 27 H. 509 (1923).

Magistrate removed from office for accepting bribe. 10 H.
285 (1896).

Section was not in violation of Hawaii constitution's
provision [article VI, §3] prohibiting full-time judges from practicing law
during their term of office. 74 H. 394, 846 P.2d 894 (1993).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next